Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.105

Native language development and retention—Dual language learning—Rules.

(1) The department of children, youth, and families must work with community partners to support outreach and education for parents and families around the benefits of native language development and retention, as well as the benefits of dual language learning. Native language means the language normally used by an individual or, in the case of a child or youth, the language normally used by the parents or family of the child or youth. Dual language learning means learning in two languages, generally English and a target language other than English spoken in the local community, for example Spanish, Somali, Vietnamese, Russian, Arabic, native languages, or indigenous languages where the goal is bilingualism.

(2) Within existing resources, the department must create training and professional development resources on dual language learning, such as supporting English learners, working in culturally and linguistically diverse communities, strategies for family engagement, and cultural responsiveness. The department must design the training modules to be culturally responsive.

(3) Within existing resources, the department must support dual language learning communities for teachers and coaches.

(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2018 c 58 s 44; 2017 c 236 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.215.104.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Findings—Intent—2017 c 236: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.